Maine, session 132, LD1657.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §5225, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 261, §§2 to
4, is further amended by amending subparagraph (9) to read:
(9) Costs associated with the development, sale, purchase, improvement, financial
support and operation of housing, including, but not limited to, authorized project
costs for improvements as described in section 5249 even if such improvements
are not made within an affordable housing development district as defined in
section 5246, subsection 2;
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §5225, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 261, §5, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) Authorized project costs for improvements as described in section 5249 and
the development, sale, purchase, financial support and operation of affordable
housing in support of municipal economic development activities and workforce
recruitment and retention efforts regardless of whether such costs are within an
affordable housing development district as defined in section 5246, subsection 2;
Sec. 3. 30-A MRSA §5225, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 142, §§1 to
3, is further amended by amending subparagraph (11) to read:
(11) Costs associated with the development, sale, purchase, improvement,
operation and financial support of:
(a) Affordable housing in the municipality or plantation to serve ongoing
economic development efforts, including, but not limited to, workforce
recruitment and retention and the further development of the downtown tax
increment financing districts; and
(b) Housing programs and services to assist those who are experiencing
homelessness in the municipality or plantation as defined in the municipality's
or plantation's development program; and
(c) The creation, maintenance and administration of a municipal loan or grant
program to provide assistance to qualifying purchasers of affordable housing
subject to the terms and conditions determined by the municipality establishing
the municipal loan or grant program, as long as the affordable housing for
which the loan or grant program funds will be used supports economic
development and workforce recruitment and retention efforts within the
municipality; and
Sec. 4. 30-A MRSA §5249, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2013, c. 312, §4, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (11) to read:
(11) Operating costs, including but not limited to property management and
administration, utilities, routine repairs and maintenance, insurance, real estate
taxes and funding of a projects capital reserve account; and
Sec. 5. 30-A MRSA §5249, sub-§1, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 426, §1, is
amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) Costs to establish permanent housing development revolving loan funds or
investment funds.; and
Page 1 - 132LR1141(01)

Sec. 6. 30-A MRSA §5249, sub-§1, ¶C is enacted to read:
C. Costs to establish a municipal loan or grant program to provide assistance to
qualifying purchasers of affordable housing subject to the terms and conditions
determined by the municipality establishing the municipal loan or grant program.
Notwithstanding any provision of this section or section 5225, subsection 1 to the
contrary, the use of tax increment revenue for the purposes of this paragraph does not
require that affordable housing purchased with the use of municipal loan or grant
program funds authorized by this paragraph be:
(1) Located within an affordable housing development district or tax increment
financing district; or
(2) Directly related to or made necessary by the establishment or operation of any
such district.